West Virginia, session 2026, HB4238.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Division of Financial Institutions. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §31A-8-12b of this code, relating to the Division of Financial Institutions (the installation, operation, and sharing of customer bank communication terminals and the utilization of nonexclusive access interchange system, 106 CSR 07), is authorized.